Indiana, session 2026, HB1021.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 5-2-22-1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.161-2018,
SECTION 11, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. The following definitions apply throughout this
chapter:
(1) "Crime of child abuse" means:
(A) neglect of a dependent (IC 35-46-1-4) if the dependent is
a child and the offense is committed under:
(i) IC 35-46-1-4(a)(1);
(ii) IC 35-46-1-4(a)(2); or
(iii) IC 35-46-1-4(a)(3); or
(iv) IC 35-46-1-4(d);
(B) child selling (IC 35-46-1-4(d)); (IC 35-46-1-4(e));
(C) a sex offense (as defined in IC 11-8-8-5.2) committed
against a child; or
(D) battery against a child under:
(i) IC 35-42-2-1(e)(3) (battery on a child);
(ii) IC 35-42-2-1(g)(5)(B) (battery causing bodily injury to
2026 IN 1021—LS 6208/DI 143


a child);
(iii) IC 35-42-2-1(j) (battery causing serious bodily injury to
a child); or
(iv) IC 35-42-2-1(k) (battery resulting in the death of a
child).
(2) "Office" refers to the office of judicial administration created
under IC 33-24-6-1.
(3) "Registry" means the child abuse registry established under
section 2 of this chapter.
SECTION 2. IC 20-26-5-11.2, AS AMENDED BY P.L.1-2025,
SECTION 187, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 11.2. (a) This section applies to:
(1) a school corporation;
(2) a charter school;
(3) a state accredited nonpublic school; and
(4) an entity with which the school corporation, charter school, or
state accredited nonpublic school contracts for services;
concerning employees of the school corporation, charter school, state
accredited nonpublic school, or entity who are likely to have direct,
ongoing contact with children within the scope of the employees'
employment.
(b) Subject to section 10(k) of this chapter and subsection (f), a
school corporation, charter school, state accredited nonpublic school,
or entity may not employ or contract with, and shall terminate the
employment of or contract with, an individual convicted of any of the
following offenses:
(1) Murder (IC 35-42-1-1).
(2) Causing suicide (IC 35-42-1-2).
(3) Assisting suicide (IC 35-42-1-2.5).
(4) Voluntary manslaughter (IC 35-42-1-3).
(5) Aggravated battery (IC 35-42-2-1.5).
(6) Kidnapping (IC 35-42-3-2).
(7) A sex offense (as defined in IC 11-8-8-5.2).
(8) Carjacking (IC 35-42-5-2) (repealed).
(9) Arson (IC 35-43-1-1).
(10) Public indecency (IC 35-45-4-1(a)(3), IC 35-45-4-1(a)(4),
and IC 35-45-4-1(b)) committed:
(A) after June 30, 2003; or
(B) before July 1, 2003, if the person committed the offense
by, in a public place, engaging in sexual intercourse or other
sexual conduct (as defined in IC 35-31.5-2-221.5).
(11) Neglect of a dependent as a Class B felony (for a crime
2026 IN 1021—LS 6208/DI 143


committed before July 1, 2014) or a Level 1 felony or Level 3
felony (for a crime committed after June 30, 2014) (IC
35-46-1-4(b)(2) and IC 35-46-1-4(b)(3)).
(12) Child selling (IC 35-46-1-4(d)). (IC 35-46-1-4(e)).
(13) An offense relating to material or a performance that is
harmful to minors or obscene under IC 35-49-3.
If an entity described in subsection (a)(4) obtains information that an
individual employed by the entity who works at a particular school
corporation, charter school, or state accredited nonpublic school has
been convicted of an offense described in this subsection, the entity
shall immediately notify the school corporation, charter school, or state
accredited nonpublic school of the employee's conviction.
(c) After June 30, 2023, a school corporation, charter school, state
accredited nonpublic school, or entity may employ or contract with an
individual convicted of any of the following offenses if a majority of
the members elected or appointed to the governing body of the school
corporation, or the equivalent body for a charter school, approves the
employment or contract as a separate, special agenda item, or if the
school administrator of a state accredited nonpublic school informs the
administrator's appointing authority of the hiring:
(1) An offense relating to operating a motor vehicle while
intoxicated under IC 9-30-5.
(2) Reckless homicide (IC 35-42-1-5).
(3) Battery (IC 35-42-2-1).
(4) Domestic battery (IC 35-42-2-1.3).
(5) Criminal confinement (IC 35-42-3-3).
(6) Public indecency (IC 35-45-4-1(a)(1) or IC 35-45-4-1(a)(2))
committed:
(A) after June 30, 2003; or
(B) before July 1, 2003, if the person committed the offense
by, in a public place, engaging in sexual intercourse or other
sexual conduct (as defined in IC 35-31.5-2-221.5).
(7) Contributing to the delinquency of a minor (IC 35-46-1-8).
(8) An offense involving a weapon under IC 35-47 or IC 35-47.5.
(9) An offense relating to controlled substances under IC 35-48-4,
other than an offense involving marijuana or paraphernalia used
to consume marijuana.
(d) An individual employed by a school corporation, charter school,
state accredited nonpublic school, or entity described in subsection (a)
shall notify the governing body of the school, if during the course of the
individual's employment, the individual:
(1) is convicted in Indiana or another jurisdiction of an offense
2026 IN 1021—LS 6208/DI 143


described in subsection (b) or (c); or
(2) is the subject of a substantiated report of child abuse or
neglect.
(e) A school corporation, charter school, state accredited nonpublic
school, or entity may use information obtained under section 10 of this
chapter concerning an individual being the subject of a substantiated
report of child abuse or neglect as grounds to not employ or contract
with the individual.
(f) A school corporation, charter school, state accredited nonpublic
school, or entity is not required to consider whether information
concerning an individual's conviction:
(1) requires the school or entity to:
(A) not employ; or
(B) not contract with; or
(2) constitutes grounds to terminate the employment of or contract
with;
an individual under subsection (b) if the individual's conviction is
reversed, vacated, or set aside.
(g) Nothing in this section prohibits a school corporation, charter
school, state accredited nonpublic school, or entity from establishing
procedures to verify the accuracy of the information obtained under
section 10 of this chapter concerning an individual's conviction.
(h) A school corporation, charter school, or state accredited
nonpublic school may not hire or contract with an individual:
(1) who is required to wear an ankle monitor as the result of a
criminal conviction;
(2) who entered into an agreement to settle an allegation of
misconduct relating to the health, safety, or well-being of a
student at a school corporation, charter school, or state accredited
nonpublic school, if the agreement included a nondisclosure
agreement covering the alleged misconduct; or
(3) who, in an academic environment, engaged in a course of
conduct involving repeated or continuing contact with a child that
is intended to prepare or condition the child for sexual activity (as
defined in IC 35-42-4-13);
unless a majority of the members elected or appointed to the governing
body of the school corporation, or the equivalent body for a charter
school, approves the hire or contract as a separate, special agenda item,
or unless the school administrator of a state accredited nonpublic
school informs the administrator's appointing authority of the hiring.
(i) For purposes of subsection (h), "misconduct relating to the
health, safety, or well-being of a student" includes:
2026 IN 1021—LS 6208/DI 143


(1) engaging in a pattern of flirtatious or otherwise inappropriate
comments;
(2) making any effort to gain unreasonable access to, and time
alone with, any student with no discernible educational purpose;
(3) engaging in any behavior that can reasonably be construed as
involving an inappropriate and overly personal and intimate
relationship with, conduct toward, or focus on a student;
(4) telling explicit sexual jokes and stories;
(5) making sexually related comments;
(6) engaging in sexual kidding or teasing;
(7) engaging in sexual innuendos or making comments with
double entendre;
(8) inappropriate physical touching;
(9) using spoken, written, or any electronic communication to
importune, invite, participate with, or entice a person to expose or
touch the person's own or another person's intimate body parts or
to observe the student's intimate body parts via any form of
computer network or system, any social media platform,
telephone network, or data network or by text message or instant
messaging;
(10) sexual advances or requests for sexual favors;
(11) physical or romantic relationship including but not limited to
sexual intercourse or oral sexual intercourse;
(12) discussion of one's personal romantic or sexual feelings or
activities;
(13) discussion, outside of a professional teaching or counseling
context endorsed or required by an employing school district, of
a student's romantic or sexual feelings or activities;
(14) displaying, sharing, or transmitting pornographic or sexually
explicit materials;
(15) any physical contact that the student previously has indicated
is unwelcome, unless such contact is professionally required, such
as to teach a sport or other skill, or to protect the safety of the
student or others;
(16) other than for purposes of addressing student dress code
violations or concerns, referencing the physical appearance or
clothes of a student in a way that could be interpreted as sexual;
and
(17) self-disclosure or physical exposure of a sexual, romantic, or
erotic nature.
SECTION 3. IC 31-9-2-84.8, AS AMENDED BY P.L.142-2020,
SECTION 34, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
2026 IN 1021—LS 6208/DI 143


JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 84.8. "Nonwaivable offense", for purposes of this
title, means a conviction of any of the following felonies:
(1) Murder (IC 35-42-1-1).
(2) Causing suicide (IC 35-42-1-2).
(3) Assisting suicide (IC 35-42-1-2.5).
(4) Voluntary manslaughter (IC 35-42-1-3).
(5) Involuntary manslaughter (IC 35-42-1-4).
(6) Reckless homicide (IC 35-42-1-5).
(7) Feticide (IC 35-42-1-6).
(8) Battery (IC 35-42-2-1) within the past five (5) years.
(9) Domestic battery (IC 35-42-2-1.3).
(10) Aggravated battery (IC 35-42-2-1.5).
(11) Criminal recklessness (IC 35-42-2-2) within the past five (5)
years.
(12) Strangulation (IC 35-42-2-9).
(13) Kidnapping (IC 35-42-3-2).
(14) Criminal confinement (IC 35-42-3-3) within the past five (5)
years.
(15) Human and sexual trafficking (IC 35-42-3.5).
(16) A felony sex offense under IC 35-42-4.
(17) Arson (IC 35-43-1-1) within the past five (5) years.
(18) Incest (IC 35-46-1-3).
(19) Neglect of a dependent (IC 35-46-1-4(a), and
IC 35-46-1-4(b)). IC 35-46-1-4(b), and IC 35-46-1-4(d)).
(20) Child selling (IC 35-46-1-4(d)). (IC 35-46-1-4(e)).
(21) Reckless supervision (IC 35-46-1-4.1).
(22) Nonsupport of a dependent child (IC 35-46-1-5) within the
past five (5) years.
(23) Operating a motorboat while intoxicated (IC 35-46-9-6)
within the past five (5) years.
(24) A felony involving a weapon under IC 35-47 within the past
five (5) years.
(25) A felony relating to controlled substances under IC 35-48-4
within the past five (5) years.
(26) An offense relating to material or a performance that is
harmful to minors or obscene under IC 35-49-3.
(27) A felony under IC 9-30-5 within the past five (5) years.
(28) A felony related to the health or safety of a child (as defined
in IC 31-9-2-13(h)) or an endangered adult (as defined in
IC 12-10-3-2).
SECTION 4. IC 35-31.5-2-19.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
2026 IN 1021—LS 6208/DI 143


[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 19.5. "Antique firearm", for
purposes of IC 35-46-1-4(d), has the meaning set forth in 18 U.S.C.
921(a)(16).
SECTION 5. IC 35-31.5-2-171.3 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 171.3. "Inoperable firearm", for
purposes of IC 35-46-1-4(d), means a firearm that is permanently
unable to discharge or expel a projectile by means of an explosion.
The term does not include a firearm that may be modified to
discharge or expel a projectile by means of an explosion.
SECTION 6. IC 35-31.5-2-188.1 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 188.1. "Loaded firearm", for
purposes of section 288.5 of this chapter and IC 35-46-1-4(d),
means a firearm with one (1) or more of the following
characteristics:
(1) A bullet, cartridge, projectile, or round in the breech,
chamber, or cylinder of the firearm.
(2) Ammunition in close proximity to the firearm so that a
person can readily insert the ammunition into the firearm.
(3) Ammunition that is:
(A) inserted or stored inside:
(i) the firing chamber;
(ii) a cylinder; or
(iii) a fixed magazine;
of the firearm; or
(B) housed or stored inside a detachable magazine for the
firearm.
SECTION 7. IC 35-31.5-2-288.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 288.5. "Secure a loaded firearm",
for purposes of IC 35-46-1-4(d), means to prevent unauthorized
access to a loaded firearm. The term includes the following:
(1) Placing or storing the firearm in a locked container.
(2) Temporarily rendering the firearm inoperable by:
(A) use of a trigger lock, bore lock, cable lock, or
comparable device; or
(B) disassembling the firearm in a manner that prevents
the firearm from operating.
SECTION 8. IC 35-46-1-4, AS AMENDED BY P.L.170-2021,
SECTION 4, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 4. (a) A person having the care of a dependent,
2026 IN 1021—LS 6208/DI 143


whether assumed voluntarily or because of a legal obligation, who
knowingly or intentionally:
(1) places the dependent in a situation that endangers the
dependent's life or health;
(2) abandons or cruelly confines the dependent;
(3) deprives the dependent of necessary support; or
(4) deprives the dependent of education as required by law;
commits neglect of a dependent, a Level 6 felony.
(b) However, the offense is:
(1) a Level 5 felony if it is committed under subsection (a)(1),
(a)(2), or (a)(3) and:
(A) results in bodily injury; or
(B) is:
(i) committed in a location where a person is violating
IC 35-48-4-1 (dealing in cocaine or a narcotic drug),
IC 35-48-4-1.1 (dealing in methamphetamine), or
IC 35-48-4-1.2 (manufacturing methamphetamine); or
(ii) the result of a violation of IC 35-48-4-1 (dealing in
cocaine or a narcotic drug), IC 35-48-4-1.1 (dealing in
methamphetamine), or IC 35-48-4-1.2 (manufacturing
methamphetamine);
(2) a Level 3 felony if it is committed under subsection (a)(1),
(a)(2), or (a)(3) and results in serious bodily injury;
(3) a Level 1 felony if it is committed under subsection (a)(1),
(a)(2), or (a)(3) by a person at least eighteen (18) years of age and
results in the death or catastrophic injury of a dependent who is
less than fourteen (14) years of age or in the death or catastrophic
injury of a dependent of any age who has a mental or physical
disability; and
(4) a Level 5 felony if it is committed under subsection (a)(2) and
consists of cruel confinement or abandonment that:
(A) deprives a dependent of necessary food, water, or sanitary
facilities;
(B) consists of confinement in an area not intended for human
habitation; or
(C) involves the unlawful use of handcuffs, a rope, a cord,
tape, or a similar device to physically restrain a dependent.
(c) It is a defense to a prosecution based on an alleged act under this
section that:
(1) the accused person left a dependent child who was, at the time
the alleged act occurred, not more than thirty (30) days of age:
(A) in a newborn safety device described in
2026 IN 1021—LS 6208/DI 143


IC 31-34-2.5-1(a)(2), IC 31-34-2.5-1(a)(3),
IC 31-34-2.5-1(a)(4), or IC 31-34-2.5-1(a)(5); or
(B) with a person who is an emergency medical services
provider (as defined in IC 16-41-10-1) who took custody of the
child under IC 31-34-2.5;
when the prosecution is based solely on the alleged act of leaving
the child in the newborn safety device or with the emergency
medical services provider and the alleged act did not result in
bodily injury or serious bodily injury to the child; or
(2) the accused person, in the legitimate practice of the accused
person's religious belief, provided treatment by spiritual means
through prayer, in lieu of medical care, to the accused person's
dependent.
(d) This subsection does not apply to the following:
(1) An inoperable firearm.
(2) An antique firearm.
(3) A person who carries a firearm:
(A) on his or her person; or
(B) in such proximity to his or her person that the firearm
may be readily retrieved and used.
(4) Any use of a firearm described in IC 35-47-10-1(b).
(5) Any possession of a firearm described in IC 34-28-7.
A person having the care of a dependent, whether assumed
voluntarily or because of a legal obligation, who recklessly,
knowingly, or intentionally fails to secure a loaded firearm in the
person's residence or vehicle, commits neglect of a dependent, a
Level 6 felony, if the dependent uses the firearm to cause bodily
injury or death to any person. However, the offense is a Level 5
felony if the person has a prior unrelated conviction for neglect of
a dependent under this section. It is a defense to a prosecution
under this subsection that the injury or death inflicted on the other
person occurred during a lawful act of self-defense or defense of a
third party.
(d) (e) Except for property transferred or received:
(1) under a court order made in connection with a proceeding
under IC 31-15, IC 31-16, IC 31-17, or IC 31-35 (or IC 31-1-11.5
or IC 31-6-5 before their repeal); or
(2) under section 9(d) of this chapter;
a person who transfers or receives any property in consideration for the
termination of the care, custody, or control of a person's dependent
child commits child selling, a Level 6 felony.
SECTION 9. IC 35-47-2-14.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
2026 IN 1021—LS 6208/DI 143


CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 14.5. (a) A retail dealer shall
conspicuously display at the site of the retail dealer's business a
sign with the following language:
"IT IS A FELONY FOR A PERSON HAVING THE CARE OF
A DEPENDENT TO FAIL TO SECURE A LOADED FIREARM
IN THE PERSON'S RESIDENCE OR VEHICLE, IF THE
DEPENDENT USES THE FIREARM TO CAUSE BODILY
INJURY OR DEATH.".
(b) A retail dealer who knowingly or intentionally violates
subsection (a) commits a Class C infraction. However, the violation
is a Class A infraction if the retail dealer has a prior unrelated
adjudication for the violation.
2026 IN 1021—LS 6208/DI 143